Missouri, session 2026, HB2542.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.503, to read as follows:
9.503. March first each year is hereby designated as "Dr. Mun Choi Day" in
2 Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
3 and activities to honor the hard work and dedication of the twenty-fourth president of
4 the University of Missouri system.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.